Washington, session 2025-2026, SB6070.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 9.73.260 and 2023 c 193 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:(1) As used in this section:(a) "Wire communication" means any aural transfer made in whole or in part through the use of facilities for the transmission of communications by the aid of wire, cable, or other like connection between the point of origin and the point of reception, including the use of such connection in a switching station, furnished or operated by any person engaged in providing or operating such facilities for the transmission of intrastate, interstate, or foreign communications, and such term includes any electronic storage of such communication.(b) "Electronic communication" means any transfer of signs, signals, writing, images, sounds, data, or intelligence of any nature transmitted in whole or in part by a wire, radio, electromagnetic, photoelectronic, or photo-optical system, but does not include:(i) Any wire or oral communication;(ii) Any communication made through a tone-only paging device; or(iii) Any communication from a tracking device, but solely to the extent the tracking device is owned by the applicable law enforcement agency.(c) "Electronic communication service" means any service that provides to users thereof the ability to send or receive wire or electronic communications.(d) "Pen register" means a device that records or decodes electronic or other impulses that identify the numbers dialed or otherwise transmitted on the telephone line to which such device is attached, but such term does not include any device used by a provider or customer of a wire or electronic communication service for billing, or recording as an incident to billing, for communications services provided by such provider or any device used by a provider or customer of a wire communication service for cost accounting or other like purposes in the ordinary course of its business.(e) "Trap and trace device" means a device that captures the incoming electronic or other impulses that identify the originating number of an instrument or device from which a wire or electronic communication was transmitted.(f) "Cell site simulator device" means a device that transmits or receives radio waves for the purpose of conducting one or more of the following operations: (i) Identifying, locating, or tracking the movements of a communications device; (ii) intercepting, obtaining, accessing, or forwarding the communications, stored data, or metadata of a communications device; (iii) affecting the hardware or software operations or functions of a communications device; (iv) forcing transmissions from or connections to a communications device; (v) denying a communications device access to other communications devices, communications protocols, or services; or (vi) spoofing or simulating a communications device, cell tower, cell site, or service including, but not limited to, an international mobile subscriber identity catcher or other invasive cell phone or telephone surveillance or eavesdropping device that mimics a cell phone tower and sends out signals to cause cell phones in the area to transmit their locations, identifying information, and communications content, or a passive interception device or digital analyzer that does not send signals to a communications device under surveillance. A cell site simulator device does not include any device used or installed by an electric utility, as defined in RCW 19.280.020, solely to the extent such device is used by that utility to measure electrical usage, to provide services to customers, or to operate the electric grid.(g) "Missing endangered person" has the same meaning as in RCW 13.60.010.(2) No person may install or use a pen register, trap and trace device, or cell site simulator device without a prior court order issued under this section except as provided under subsection (6) of this section or RCW 9.73.070.(3) A law enforcement officer may apply for and the superior court may issue orders and extensions of orders authorizing the installation and use of pen registers, trap and trace devices, and cell site simulator devices as provided in this section. The application shall be under oath and shall include the identity of the officer making the application and the identity of the law enforcement agency conducting the criminal investigation or fulfilling community caretaking functions. The applicant must certify that the information likely to be obtained is relevant to an ongoing criminal investigation being conducted by that agency or is necessary for law enforcement to fulfill community caretaking functions.(4) If the court finds that the information likely to be obtained by such installation and use is relevant to an ongoing criminal investigation or is necessary for law enforcement to fulfill community caretaking functions and finds that there is probable cause to believe that the pen register, trap and trace device, or cell site simulator device will lead to obtaining evidence of a crime, contraband, fruits of crime, things criminally possessed, weapons, or other things by means of which a crime has been committed or reasonably appears about to be committed, or will lead to learning the location of a person who is unlawfully restrained or reasonably believed to be a witness in a criminal investigation or for whose arrest there is probable cause, or may aid in locating a missing endangered person, the court shall enter an ex parte order authorizing the installation and use of a pen register, trap and trace device, or cell site simulator device. The order shall specify:(a)(i) In the case of a pen register or trap and trace device, the identity, if known, of the person to whom is leased or in whose name is listed the telephone line to which the pen register or trap and trace device is to be attached; or(ii) In the case of a cell site simulator device, the identity, if known, of (A) the person to whom is subscribed or in whose name is subscribed the electronic communications service utilized by the device to which the cell site simulator device is to be used and (B) the person who possesses the device to which the cell site simulator device is to be used;(b) The identity, if known, of ((the)):(i) The person who is the subject of the criminal investigation; or(ii) The missing endangered person;(c)(i) In the case of a pen register or trap and trace device, the number and, if known, physical location of the telephone line to which the pen register or trap and trace device is to be attached and, in the case of a trap and trace device, the geographic limits of the trap and trace order; or(ii) In the case of a cell site simulator device: (A) The telephone number or other unique subscriber account number identifying the wire or electronic communications service account used by the device to which the cell site simulator device is to be attached or used; (B) if known, the physical location of the device to which the cell site simulator device is to be attached or used; (C) the type of device, and the communications protocols being used by the device, to which the cell site simulator device is to be attached or used; (D) the geographic area that will be covered by the cell site simulator device; (E) all categories of metadata, data, or information to be collected by the cell site simulator device from the targeted device including, but not limited to, call records and geolocation information; (F) whether or not the cell site simulator device will incidentally collect metadata, data, or information from any parties or devices not specified in the court order, and if so, what categories of information or metadata will be collected; and (G) any disruptions to access or use of a communications or internet access network that may be created by use of the device; and(d) A statement of the offense or a description of the missing endangered person to which the information likely to be obtained by the pen register, trap and trace device, or cell site simulator device relates.The order shall direct, if the applicant has requested, the furnishing of information, facilities, and technical assistance necessary to accomplish the installation of the pen register, trap and trace device, or cell site simulator device. An order issued under this section shall authorize the installation and use of a: (i) Pen register or a trap and trace device for a period not to exceed sixty days; and (ii) cell site simulator device for sixty days. An extension of the original order may only be granted upon: A new application for an order under subsection (3) of this section; and a showing that there is a probability that the information or items sought under this subsection are more likely to be obtained under the extension than under the original order. No extension beyond the first extension shall be granted unless: There is a showing that there is a high probability that the information or items sought under this subsection are much more likely to be obtained under the second or subsequent extension than under the original order; and there are extraordinary circumstances such as a direct and immediate danger of death or serious bodily injury to a law enforcement officer. The period of extension shall be for a period not to exceed sixty days.An order authorizing or approving the installation and use of a pen register, trap and trace device, or cell site simulator device shall direct that the order be sealed until otherwise ordered by the court and that the person owning or leasing the line to which the pen register, trap and trace device, and cell site simulator device is attached or used, or who has been ordered by the court to provide assistance to the applicant, not disclose the existence of the pen register, trap and trace device, or cell site simulator device or the existence of the investigation to the listed subscriber or to any other person, unless or until otherwise ordered by the court.(5) Upon the presentation of an order, entered under subsection (4) of this section, by an officer of a law enforcement agency authorized to install and use a pen register under this chapter, a provider of wire or electronic communication service, landlord, custodian, or other person shall furnish such law enforcement officer forthwith all information, facilities, and technical assistance necessary to accomplish the installation of the pen register unobtrusively and with a minimum of interference with the services that the person so ordered by the court accords the party with respect to whom the installation and use is to take place, if such assistance is directed by a court order as provided in subsection (4) of this section.Upon the request of an officer of a law enforcement agency authorized to receive the results of a trap and trace device under this chapter, a provider of a wire or electronic communication service, landlord, custodian, or other person shall install such device forthwith on the appropriate line and shall furnish such law enforcement officer all additional information, facilities, and technical assistance including installation and operation of the device unobtrusively and with a minimum of interference with the services that the person so ordered by the court accords the party with respect to whom the installation and use is to take place, if such installation and assistance is directed by a court order as provided in subsection (4) of this section. Unless otherwise ordered by the court, the results of the trap and trace device shall be furnished to the officer of a law enforcement agency, designated in the court order, at reasonable intervals during regular business hours for the duration of the order.A provider of a wire or electronic communication service, landlord, custodian, or other person who furnishes facilities or technical assistance pursuant to this subsection shall be reasonably compensated by the law enforcement agency that requests the facilities or assistance for such reasonable expenses incurred in providing such facilities and assistance.No cause of action shall lie in any court against any provider of a wire or electronic communication service, its officers, employees, agents, or other specified persons for providing information, facilities, or assistance in accordance with the terms of a court order under this section. A good faith reliance on a court order under this section, a request pursuant to this section, a legislative authorization, or a statutory authorization is a complete defense against any civil or criminal action brought under this chapter or any other law.(6)(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, a law enforcement officer and a prosecuting attorney or deputy prosecuting attorney who jointly and reasonably determine in an ongoing criminal investigation, or a law enforcement officer who reasonably determines in a missing endangered person case, that there is probable cause to believe that an emergency situation exists that involves immediate danger of death or serious bodily injury to any person that requires the installation and use of a pen register, trap and trace device, or cell site simulator device before an order authorizing such installation and use can, with due diligence, be obtained, and there are grounds upon which an order could be entered under this chapter to authorize such installation and use, may have installed and use a pen register, trap and trace device, or cell site simulator device ((if)). If such an action was taken pursuant to an ongoing criminal investigation or to locate a missing endangered person, law enforcement must obtain, within ((forty-eight))48 hours after the installation has occurred, or begins to occur, an order approving the installation or use is issued in accordance with subsection (4) of this section. In the absence of an authorizing order, such use pursuant to an ongoing criminal investigation or to locate a missing endangered person shall immediately terminate when the information sought is obtained((,)); when the application for the order is denied; or when ((forty-eight))48 hours have lapsed since the installation of the pen register, trap and trace device, or cell site simulator device((,)); whichever is earlier. If an order approving the installation or use is not obtained within ((forty-eight))48 hours, any information obtained is not admissible as evidence in any legal proceeding. The knowing installation or use by any law enforcement officer of a pen register, trap and trace device, or cell site simulator device in an ongoing criminal investigation pursuant to this subsection without application for the authorizing order within ((forty-eight))48 hours of the installation shall constitute a violation of this chapter and be punishable as a gross misdemeanor. A provider of a wire or electronic service, landlord, custodian, or other person who furnished facilities or technical assistance pursuant to this subsection shall be reasonably compensated by the law enforcement agency that requests the facilities or assistance for such reasonable expenses incurred in providing such facilities and assistance.(b) A law enforcement agency that authorizes the installation of a pen register, trap and trace device, or cell site simulator device under this subsection (6) shall file a monthly report with the administrator for the courts. The report shall indicate the number of authorizations made, the date and time of each authorization, whether a court authorization was sought within ((forty-eight))48 hours, and whether a subsequent court authorization was granted.(c) A law enforcement agency authorized to use a cell site simulator device in accordance with this section must: (i) Take all steps necessary to limit the collection of any information or metadata to the target specified in the applicable court order; (ii) take all steps necessary to permanently delete any information or metadata collected from any party not specified in the applicable court order immediately following such collection and must not transmit, use, or retain such information or metadata for any purpose whatsoever; and (iii) delete any information or metadata collected from the target specified in the court order within ((thirty))30 days if there is no longer probable cause to support the belief that such information or metadata is evidence of a crime.(d) If a law enforcement agency has not obtained a court order approving the use of a cell site simulator device in accordance with this section within 48 hours, or if the application for the court order is denied, the law enforcement agency must take all steps necessary to permanently delete any information or metadata collected from any party upon expiration of the 48 hours or upon denial of the court order, and must not transmit, use, or retain such information or metadata for any purpose whatsoever.(7)(a) If an application for the installation and use of a pen register, trap and trace device, or cell site simulator device is for the purpose of investigating or recovering evidence that relates to an investigation that alleges criminal liability for the provision, receipt, attempted provision or receipt, assistance in the provision or receipt, or attempted assistance in the provision or receipt of protected health care services as defined in RCW 7.115.010 that are lawful in the state of Washington, the applicant shall include an attestation, made under penalty of perjury, stating that the application seeks information related to the provision, receipt, attempted provision or receipt, assistance in the provision or receipt, or attempted assistance in the provision or receipt of protected health care services as defined in RCW 7.115.010 that are lawful in the state of Washington.(b) The court shall not issue an order for the installation and use of pen registers, trap and trace devices, and cell site simulator devices for the purpose of investigating or recovering evidence that relates to an investigation that alleges criminal liability for the provision, receipt, attempted provision or receipt, assistance in the provision or receipt, or attempted assistance in the provision or receipt of protected health care services as defined in RCW 7.115.010 that are lawful in the state of Washington.Sec. 2. RCW 10.79.035 and 2014 c 93 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Any magistrate as defined by RCW 2.20.010, when satisfied that there is probable cause, may(([,])), upon application supported by oath or affirmation, issue a search warrant to search for and seize any: (a) Evidence of a crime; (b) contraband, the fruits of crime, or things otherwise criminally possessed; (c) weapons or other things by means of which a crime has been committed or reasonably appears about to be committed; ((or)) (d) person for whose arrest there is probable cause or who is unlawfully restrained; or (e) evidence that may aid in locating a missing endangered person.(2) The application may be provided or transmitted to the magistrate by telephone, email, or any other reliable method.(3) If the magistrate finds that probable cause for the issuance of a warrant exists, the magistrate must issue a warrant or direct an individual whom the magistrate authorizes to affix the magistrate's signature to a warrant identifying the property or person and naming or describing the person, place, or thing to be searched. The magistrate may communicate permission to affix the magistrate's signature to the warrant by telephone, email, or any other reliable method.(4) The evidence in support of the finding of probable cause and a record of the magistrate's permission to affix the magistrate's signature to the warrant shall be preserved and shall be filed with the issuing court as required by CrRLJ 2.3 or CrR 2.3.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 10.79 RCW to read as follows:A court may consider the following nonexclusive list of factors when asked to determine whether there is probable cause for a law enforcement officer to perform community caretaking functions to help locate a missing endangered person under RCW 9.73.260 when the current whereabouts of the person is unknown:(1) The person has a recent history of suicidal ideation;(2) The person has an apparent lack of access to prescribed medications;(3) The person left behind personal items that one would expect them to take if their disappearance was voluntary, such as identification, money, financial access devices, cell phone, and their regular means of transportation;(4) The disappearance involves an unusual and unexplained absence from work, school, or other regularly scheduled activity;(5) The person is a minor who lacks the skills for long-term self-care and safety;(6) There is evidence to suggest the person is suffering a significant mental health crisis leaving them unable to manage the person's care and safety;(7) The person was the primary caregiver for another person or animal and they made no effort to arrange for a continuation of care;(8) The location and conditions in the area where the person is suspected to be located, combined with their available resources, are not consistent with long-term survival;(9) The person has a developmental disability as defined in RCW 71A.10.020;(10) The person is a vulnerable adult as defined in RCW 74.34.020;(11) The person is a minor for whom law enforcement can identify multiple risk factors that are indicative that the minor is a current victim of human trafficking or commercial sexual exploitation; or(12) The person is believed to have Alzheimer's disease or other age-related dementia that inhibits the person's ability to manage the person's care and safety.Sec. 4. RCW 13.60.010 and 2022 c 256 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The Washington state patrol shall establish a missing children and endangered person clearinghouse which shall include the maintenance and operation of a toll-free telephone hotline. The clearinghouse shall distribute information to local law enforcement agencies, school districts, the department of children, youth, and families, and the general public regarding missing children and endangered persons. The information shall include pictures, bulletins, training sessions, reports, and biographical materials that will assist in local law enforcement efforts to locate missing children and endangered persons. The state patrol shall also maintain a regularly updated computerized link with national and other statewide missing person systems or clearinghouses, and within existing resources, shall develop and implement a plan, commonly known as an "amber alert plan" or an "endangered missing person advisory plan" which includes (("silver alert" and))"ebony alert," "missing indigenous person alert," "silver alert," and "purple alert" designations for voluntary cooperation between local, state, tribal, and other law enforcement agencies, state government agencies, radio and television stations, cable and satellite systems, and social media pages and sites to enhance the public's ability to assist in recovering abducted children and missing endangered persons consistent with the state endangered missing person advisory plan.(2) For the purposes of this chapter:(a) "Child" or "children" means an individual under 18 years of age.(b) "Missing endangered person" means:(i) A missing black person;(ii) A missing indigenous woman or indigenous person; ((or(ii)))(iii) A person who is believed to be in danger because of age((,)); health((, mental or)); physical, mental, or sensory disability((, in combination with environmental or weather conditions, or)); or suicidal ideation; and is believed to be unable to return to safety without assistance ((and who is:(A)));(iv) A missing person with a developmental disability as defined in RCW 71A.10.020(((5)));(((B)))(v) A missing vulnerable adult as defined in RCW 74.34.020; or(((C)))(vi) A missing person who has been diagnosed as having Alzheimer's disease or other age-related dementia.(c) "Ebony alert" means the designated title of a missing endangered person advisory that will be used on a variable message sign and text of the highway advisory radio message when used as part of an activated advisory to assist in the recovery of a missing black person.(d) "Physical, mental, or sensory disability" has the same meaning as in RCW 74.29.010.(e) "Missing indigenous person alert" means the designated title of a missing endangered person advisory that will be used on a variable message sign and text of the highway advisory radio message when used as part of an activated advisory to assist in the recovery of a missing indigenous person.(((d)))(f) "Silver alert" means the designated title of a missing endangered person advisory that will be used on a variable message sign and text of the highway advisory radio message when used as part of an activated advisory to assist in the recovery of a missing endangered person age 60 or older.(g) "Purple alert" means the designated title of a missing endangered person advisory that will be used on a variable message sign and text of the highway advisory radio message when used as part of an activated advisory to assist in the recovery of a missing person with a disability.Sec. 5. RCW 42.56.240 and 2024 c 299 s 2 and 2024 c 298 s 21 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:The following investigative, law enforcement, and crime victim information is exempt from public inspection and copying under this chapter:(1) Specific intelligence information and specific investigative records compiled by investigative, law enforcement, and penology agencies, and state agencies vested with the responsibility to discipline members of any profession, the nondisclosure of which is essential to effective law enforcement or for the protection of any person's right to privacy;(2) Information revealing the identity of persons who are witnesses to or victims of crime or who file complaints with investigative, law enforcement, or penology agencies, other than the commission, if disclosure would endanger any person's life, physical safety, or property. If at the time a complaint is filed the complainant, victim, or witness indicates a desire for disclosure or nondisclosure, such desire shall govern. However, all complaints filed with the commission about any elected official or candidate for public office must be made in writing and signed by the complainant under oath;(3) Any records of investigative reports prepared by any state, county, municipal, or other law enforcement agency pertaining to sex offenses contained in chapter 9A.44 RCW or sexually violent offenses as defined in RCW 71.09.020, which have been transferred to the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs for permanent electronic retention and retrieval pursuant to RCW 40.14.070(2)(b);(4) License applications under RCW 9.41.070, except that copies of license applications or information on the applications may be released to law enforcement or corrections agencies or to persons and entities as authorized under RCW 9.41.815;(5)(a) Information revealing the specific details that describe an alleged or proven child victim of sexual assault or commercial sexual exploitation under age 18, or the identity or contact information of an alleged or proven child victim of sexual assault or commercial sexual exploitation who is under age 18. Identifying information includes the child victim's name, addresses, location, photograph, and in cases in which the child victim is a relative, stepchild, or stepsibling of the alleged perpetrator, identification of the relationship between the child and the alleged perpetrator. Contact information includes phone numbers, email addresses, social media profiles, and user names and passwords.(b) For purposes of this subsection (5), "commercial sexual exploitation" has the same meaning as in RCW 7.105.010;(6) Information contained in a local or regionally maintained gang database as well as the statewide gang database referenced in RCW 43.43.762;(7) Data from the electronic sales tracking system established in RCW 69.43.165;(8) Information submitted to the statewide unified sex offender notification and registration program under RCW 36.28A.040(6) by a person for the purpose of receiving notification regarding a registered sex offender, including the person's name, residential address, and email address;(9) Personally identifying information collected by law enforcement agencies pursuant to local security alarm system programs and vacation crime watch programs. Nothing in this subsection shall be interpreted so as to prohibit the legal owner of a residence or business from accessing information regarding his or her residence or business;(10) The felony firearm offense conviction database of felony firearm offenders established in RCW 43.43.822;(11) The identity of a state employee or officer who has in good faith filed a complaint with an ethics board, as provided in RCW 42.52.410, or who has in good faith reported improper governmental action, as defined in RCW 42.40.020, to the auditor or other public official, as defined in RCW 42.40.020;(12) The following security threat group information collected and maintained by the department of corrections pursuant to RCW 72.09.745: (a) Information that could lead to the identification of a person's security threat group status, affiliation, or activities; (b) information that reveals specific security threats associated with the operation and activities of security threat groups; and (c) information that identifies the number of security threat group members, affiliates, or associates;(13) The global positioning system data that would indicate the location of the residence of an employee or worker of a criminal justice agency as defined in RCW 10.97.030;(14) Body worn camera recordings to the extent nondisclosure is essential for the protection of any person's right to privacy as described in RCW 42.56.050, including, but not limited to, the circumstances enumerated in (a) of this subsection. A law enforcement or corrections agency shall not disclose a body worn camera recording to the extent the recording is exempt under this subsection.(a) Disclosure of a body worn camera recording is presumed to be highly offensive to a reasonable person under RCW 42.56.050 to the extent it depicts:(i)(A) Any areas of a medical facility, counseling, or therapeutic program office where:(I) A patient is registered to receive treatment, receiving treatment, waiting for treatment, or being transported in the course of treatment; or(II) Health care information is shared with patients, their families, or among the care team; or(B) Information that meets the definition of protected health information for purposes of the health insurance portability and accountability act of 1996 or health care information for purposes of chapter 70.02 RCW;(ii) The interior of a place of residence where a person has a reasonable expectation of privacy;(iii) An intimate image;(iv) A minor;(v) The body of a deceased person;(vi) The identity of or communications from a victim or witness of an incident involving domestic violence as defined in RCW 10.99.020 or sexual assault as defined in RCW 70.125.030, or disclosure of intimate images as defined in RCW 9A.86.010. If at the time of recording the victim or witness indicates a desire for disclosure or nondisclosure of the recorded identity or communications, such desire shall govern; or(vii) The identifiable location information of a community-based domestic violence program as defined in RCW 70.123.020, or emergency shelter as defined in RCW 70.123.020.(b) The presumptions set out in (a) of this subsection may be rebutted by specific evidence in individual cases.(c) In a court action seeking the right to inspect or copy a body worn camera recording, a person who prevails against a law enforcement or corrections agency that withholds or discloses all or part of a body worn camera recording pursuant to (a) of this subsection is not entitled to fees, costs, or awards pursuant to RCW 42.56.550 unless it is shown that the law enforcement or corrections agency acted in bad faith or with gross negligence.(d) A request for body worn camera recordings must:(i) Specifically identify a name of a person or persons involved in the incident;(ii) Provide the incident or case number;(iii) Provide the date, time, and location of the incident or incidents; or(iv) Identify a law enforcement or corrections officer involved in the incident or incidents.(e)(i) A person directly involved in an incident recorded by the requested body worn camera recording, an attorney representing a person directly involved in an incident recorded by the requested body worn camera recording, a person or his or her attorney who requests a body worn camera recording relevant to a criminal case involving that person, or the executive director from either the Washington state commission on African American affairs, Asian Pacific American affairs, or Hispanic affairs, has the right to obtain the body worn camera recording, subject to any exemption under this chapter or any applicable law. In addition, an attorney who represents a person regarding a potential or existing civil cause of action involving the denial of civil rights under the federal or state Constitution, or a violation of a United States department of justice settlement agreement, has the right to obtain the body worn camera recording if relevant to the cause of action, subject to any exemption under this chapter or any applicable law. The attorney must explain the relevancy of the requested body worn camera recording to the cause of action and specify that he or she is seeking relief from redaction costs under this subsection (14)(e).(ii) A law enforcement or corrections agency responding to requests under this subsection (14)(e) may not require the requesting individual to pay costs of any redacting, altering, distorting, pixelating, suppressing, or otherwise obscuring any portion of a body worn camera recording.(iii) A law enforcement or corrections agency may require any person requesting a body worn camera recording pursuant to this subsection (14)(e) to identify himself or herself to ensure he or she is a person entitled to obtain the body worn camera recording under this subsection (14)(e).(f)(i) A law enforcement or corrections agency responding to a request to disclose body worn camera recordings may require any requester not listed in (e) of this subsection to pay the reasonable costs of redacting, altering, distorting, pixelating, suppressing, or otherwise obscuring any portion of the body worn camera recording prior to disclosure only to the extent necessary to comply with the exemptions in this chapter or any applicable law.(ii) An agency that charges redaction costs under this subsection (14)(f) must use redaction technology that provides the least costly commercially available method of redacting body worn camera recordings, to the extent possible and reasonable.(iii) In any case where an agency charges a requestor for the costs of redacting a body worn camera recording under this subsection (14)(f), the time spent on redaction of the recording shall not count towards the agency's allocation of, or limitation on, time or costs spent responding to public records requests under this chapter, as established pursuant to local ordinance, policy, procedure, or state law.(g) For purposes of this subsection (14):(i) "Body worn camera recording" means a video and/or sound recording that is made by a body worn camera attached to the uniform or eyewear of a law enforcement or corrections officer while in the course of his or her official duties; and(ii) "Intimate image" means an individual or individuals engaged in sexual activity, including sexual intercourse as defined in RCW 9A.44.010 and masturbation, or an individual's intimate body parts, whether nude or visible through less than opaque clothing, including the genitals, pubic area, anus, or postpubescent female nipple.(h) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to restrict access to body worn camera recordings as otherwise permitted by law for official or recognized civilian and accountability bodies or pursuant to any court order.(i) Nothing in this section is intended to modify the obligations of prosecuting attorneys and law enforcement under Brady v. Maryland, 373 U.S. 83, 83 S. Ct. 1194, 10 L. Ed. 2d 215 (1963), Kyles v. Whitley, 541 U.S. 419, 115 S. Ct. 1555, 131 L. Ed.2d 490 (1995), and the relevant Washington court criminal rules and statutes.(j) A law enforcement or corrections agency must retain body worn camera recordings for at least 60 days and thereafter may destroy the records in accordance with the applicable records retention schedule;(15) Any records and information contained within the statewide sexual assault kit tracking system established in RCW 43.43.545;(16)(a) Survivor communications with, and survivor records maintained by, campus-affiliated advocates.(b) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to restrict access to records maintained by a campus-affiliated advocate in the event that:(i) The survivor consents to inspection or copying;(ii) There is a clear, imminent risk of serious physical injury or death of the survivor or another person;(iii) Inspection or copying is required by federal law; or(iv) A court of competent jurisdiction mandates that the record be available for inspection or copying.(c) "Campus-affiliated advocate" and "survivor" have the definitions in RCW 28B.112.030;(17) Information and records prepared, owned, used, or retained by the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs and information and records prepared, owned, used, or retained by the Washington state patrol pursuant to chapter 261, Laws of 2017;(18) Any and all audio or video recordings of child forensic interviews as defined in chapter 26.44 RCW. Such recordings are confidential and may only be disclosed pursuant to a court order entered upon a showing of good cause and with advance notice to the child's parent, guardian, or legal custodian. However, if the child is an emancipated minor or has attained the age of majority as defined in RCW 26.28.010, advance notice must be to the child. Failure to disclose an audio or video recording of a child forensic interview as defined in chapter 26.44 RCW is not grounds for penalties or other sanctions available under this chapter; ((and))(19) Information exempt from public disclosure and copying under RCW 43.10.305(2)(f); and(20)(a) Information obtained by a law enforcement officer in the course of the officer's official duties during a missing endangered person investigation, under the following conditions:(i) The investigation is ongoing; or(ii) Nondisclosure of the information is necessary to protect the missing endangered person's life, physical safety, privacy, or property. The determination that the missing endangered person's life, physical safety, privacy, or property will not be impacted by the disclosure of the information shall only occur after consulting with the missing endangered person.(b) "Missing endangered person" has the same meaning as in RCW 13.60.010.Sec. 6. RCW 36.28A.110 and 2007 c 10 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:The Washington ((association of sheriffs and police chiefs))state patrol shall create and maintain a statewide missing persons website, which shall be available to the public. The website shall post relevant information concerning persons reported missing in the state of Washington. For missing persons, the website ((shall))may contain, but is not limited to: The person's name, physical description, photograph, and other information that is deemed necessary according to the adopted protocols. This website shall allow citizens to more broadly disseminate information regarding missing persons for at least thirty days.Sec. 7. RCW 36.28A.112 and 2020 c 45 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:((When funded))Subject to the availability of funds appropriated for this purpose, the Washington ((association of sheriffs and police chiefs))state patrol must regularly transmit information contained within the statewide missing persons website created pursuant to RCW 36.28A.110 (as recodified by this act) to the national missing and unidentified persons system created by the United States department of justice's national institute of justice.Sec. 8. RCW 36.28A.120 and 2007 c 10 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:The Washington state patrol shall establish an interface with local law enforcement and the ((Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs))statewide missing persons website created pursuant to RCW 36.28A.110 (as recodified by this act), the toll-free twenty-four hour hotline, and national and other statewide missing persons systems or clearinghouses.Local law enforcement agencies shall file an official missing persons report and enter biographical information into the state missing persons computerized network without delay after notification of a missing person's report is received ((under this chapter)).Sec. 9. RCW 74.04.062 and 2024 c 208 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) Upon written request of a person who has been properly identified as an officer of the law or a properly identified United States immigration official the department or authority shall disclose to such officer the current address and location of a recipient of public welfare if the officer furnishes the department or authority with such person's name and social security account number and satisfactorily demonstrates that such recipient is a fugitive, that the location or apprehension of such fugitive is within the officer's official duties, and that the request is made in the proper exercise of those duties.(b) When the department or authority becomes aware that a public assistance recipient is the subject of an outstanding warrant, the department or authority may contact the appropriate law enforcement agency and, if the warrant is valid, provide the law enforcement agency with the location of the recipient.(2) To the extent allowed under federal law, upon written request of a law enforcement officer from a state, local, or tribal law enforcement agency, the department or authority shall disclose to such officer whether the recipient has accessed his or her public assistance benefits in the last 30 days for the purpose of assisting the officer in confirming whether the recipient is alive if the recipient is the subject of a missing person's report as described in RCW 36.28A.120 (as recodified by this act). For purposes of this section, "law enforcement officer" and "law enforcement agency" have the same meaning as defined in RCW 10.122.020.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 10. RCW 36.28A.110, 36.28A.112, and 36.28A.120 are each recodified as sections in chapter 43.43 RCW.--- END ---